District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.56

Information from source other than recipient.

(a)

When the information that is the basis for reduction or termination of payment comes from a source other than the recipient, the representative of the Mayor shall discuss the information with the recipient and notify him or her in writing that if the recipient does not agree with or accept the information, he or she has 15 days to present additional information, or, in lieu thereof, to request a fair hearing.

(b)

In arranging the appointment for the discussion, the representative of the Mayor shall advise the recipient of his or her right to bring other persons with him or her who have knowledge of his or her situation, including a legal representative if he or she so desires.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 556, 29 DCR 1060
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(uu), 46 DCR 905
1981 Ed., § 3-205.56.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(uu) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(uu) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(uu) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682),§ 2(uu) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(uu) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).